Hawaii statutes.
§11-426 Candidate exceeds voluntary
expenditure limit. A candidate who files the affidavit agreeing to limit
expenditures and who exceeds the expenditure limit for that election shall:

(1) Notify all opponents, the office of elections,
and the commission by telephone and writing on the day the expenditure limit is
exceeded;

(2) Pay the balance of the full filing fee; and

(3) Provide reasonable notice to all contributors
within thirty days of exceeding the limit that the expenditure limit was
exceeded. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 140, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next